en: Country specific beers, Beers from Country
hu: Országspecifikus sörök
lt: Šaliai būdingas alus

en: American beers, Beers from the USA
da: amerikanske øl
fr: Bières américaines, Bières des Etats-Unis, Bières des USA
hr: Američka piva
hu: Amerikai sörök
it: Birre americane, Birre dagli USA, Birre dagli Stati Uniti d'America
lt: Amerikietiškas alus, Alus iš JAV, Alus iš Amerikos
nl: Bier uit de Verenigde Staten van Amerika, Amerikaanse bieren
pl: Piwa amerykańskie, Piwo amerykańskie
zh: 美国啤酒

en: Dutch beers, Beers from the Netherlands
da: hollandske øl
de: Niederländische Biere, Biere aus den Niederlanden
es: Cervezas holandesas, Cervezas de los Países Bajos
fr: Bières néerlandaises, Bières des Pays-Bas
hr: Nizozemska piva
hu: Holland sörök
it: Birre olandesi, Birre dai Paesi Bassi
lt: Olandiškas alus, Alus iš Olandijos
nl: Nederlandse bieren, Bieren uit Nederland

en: Finnish beers, Beers from Finland
da: finske øl
es: Cervezas finlandesas, Cervezas de Finlandia
fr: Bières finnoises, bières finlandaises, Bières de Finlande
hr: Finska piva
hu: Finn sörök
lt: Suomiškas alus, alus iš Suomijos
nl: Finse bieren, Bieren uit Finland
ru: Финские пива, Пиво из Финляндии

en: French beers, Beers from France
bg: Френска бира
da: franske øl
de: Französische Biere
es: Cervezas francesas, Cervezas de Francia
fi: ranskalaiset oluet
fr: Bières françaises, Bières de France, bière française, bière de France
hr: Francuska piva
hu: Francia sörök
it: Birre francesi, birre dalla Francia
lt: Prancūziškas alus
nl: Franse bieren, Bieren uit Frankrijk
pl: Piwa francuskie
pt: Cervejas francesas
ro: Beri franțuzești, Beri frantuzesti, Bere franțuzească, Bere frantuzeasca, Bere franta, Bere franța
ru: Французское пиво

en: Corsican beers
de: Korsikanische Biere, Korsische Biere
fr: Bières corses
hr: Korzikanska piva
hu: Korzikai sörök
it: Birre corse, Birre della Corsica
nl: Corsicaanse bieren, Bieren uit Corsica

en: Brittany Beers
de: Bretonische Biere
fr: Bières bretonnes, Bières de bretagne
hr: Bretonska piva
hu: Bretagne-i sörök
it: Birre bretoni, Birre della Bretagna
nl: Bretonse bieren

en: Irish beers, Beers from Ireland
da: irske øl
de: Irische Biere
fr: Bières irlandaises
hr: Irska piva
hu: Ír sörök
it: Birre irlandesi, Birre dell'Irlanda
lt: Iriškas alus
nl: Ierse bieren
pl: Piwa irlandzkie
ro: Beri irlandeze, Beri irlanda, Bere irlandeză, Bere irlanda, Bere irlandeza

en: Italian beers, Beers from Italy
da: italienske øl
de: Italienische Biere
fi: Italialaiset oluet, Oluet Italiasta
fr: Bières italiennes
hr: Talijanska piva
hu: Olasz sörök, Olaszországi sörök
it: Birre italiane, birre dall'italia
lt: Itališkas alus
nl: Italiaanse bieren, Bieren uit Italië
pl: Piwa włoskie
ro: Beri italiene, Beri italia, Bere italia, Bere italiana, Bere italiană

en: Latvian beers, Beers from Latvia
da: lettiske øl
de: Lettische Biere, Bier aus Lettland
es: Cervezas letonas, Cervezas de Letonia
fi: latvialaiset oluet, oluet Latviasta
fr: Bières lettones, Bières de Lettonie
hr: Latvijska piva
hu: Lett sörök, Sörök Lettországból
lt: Latviškas alus, alus iš Latvijos
nl: Lettse bieren, Bieren uit Letland
pl: Piwa łotewskie, Piwa z Łotwy
ro: Beri letone, Beri din Letonia

en: Lithuanian beers, Beers from Lithuania
bg: Литовски бири, Бири от Литва
da: litauiske øl
de: Litauische Biere
es: Cervezas lituanas
fi: liettualaiset oluet
fr: Bières lituaniennes
hr: Litvanska piva
hu: Litván sörök
it: Birre lituane, Birre della Lituania
lt: Lietuviškas alus
nl: Litouwse bieren, Bieren uit Litouwen
pl: Piwa litewskie
ro: Beri lituaniene, Beri Lituania, Bere lituaniană, Bere Lituania, Bere lituană

en: Belgian beers, Beers from Belgium
bg: Белгийска бира
da: belgiske øl
de: Belgische Biere
es: Cervezas belgas
fi: belgialaiset oluet
fr: Bières belges, Bières de Belgique
hr: Belgijska piva
hu: Belga sörök, Sörök belgumból
it: Birre belghe, Birre del Belgio
lt: Belgiškas alus, alus iš Belgijos
nl: Belgische bieren, Bieren uit België
pl: Piwa belgijskie
ro: Beri belgiene, Beri Belgia, Bere Belgiană, Bere Belgia, Bere Belgiana

en: Brut des Flandres, Brut beers
xx: Brut des Flandres, Brut beers

en: Flanders red, Flemish red-brown
xx: Flanders red, Flemish red-brown

en: Lambic beers
fr: Lambic, Lambiek
hr: Lambic piva
pl: Lambiki

en: Gueuze
xx: Gueuze
fr: Gueuze-Lambic, Gueuze, Geuze-Lambiek, Geuze

en: Cherry Kriek beers, Kriek lambic beers, Kriek beers, Cherry beers
xx: Kriek beers
de: Kirschbier
es: Cervezas de cereza
fr: Bières à la cerise
it: Birre alla ciliegia
lt: Vyšnių kriek alus, vyšnių alus
nl: Kriek, Kriek-Lambic, Fruit-Lambic, Kriekenlambiek, Vruchtenlambiek, Krieken, Kersenbieren

en: Framboise beers, Framboise lambic beers
xx: Framboise beers
nl: Framboise-Lambic, Frambozenlambiek

en: Faro beers
fr: Faro

en: Bulgarian beers, Beers from Bulgaria
bg: Българска бира
fr: Bières bulgares, bières bulgariennes
hr: Bugarska piva
hu: Bolgár sörök
lt: Bulgariškas alus
pl: Piwa bułgarskie